Utah statutes.
72-5-304.   Mapping and survey requirements.

(1)  The Department of Transportation, counties, and cities are not required to possess centerline surveys for R.S. 2477 rights-of-ways.

(2)  To be accepted, highways within R.S. 2477 rights-of-way do not need to be included in the plats, descriptions, and maps of county roads required by Sections 72-3-105 and 72-3-107 or on the State Geographic Information Database, created in Section 63F-1-507, required to be maintained by Subsection (3).

(3) (a)  The Automated Geographic Reference Center, created in Section 63F-1-506, shall create and maintain a record of R.S. 2477 rights-of-way on the Geographic Information Database.

(b)  The record of R.S. 2477 rights-of-way shall be based on information maintained by the Department of Transportation and cartographic, topographic, photographic, historical, and other data available to or maintained by the Automated Geographic Reference Center.

(c)  Agencies and political subdivisions of the state may provide additional information regarding R.S. 2477 rights-of-way when information is available.

